Hawaii statutes.
[§431:11A-103] Minimum standards. (a)
The minimum standards specified in this section shall apply if, in any calendar
year, the aggregate amount of gross written premiums on business placed with a
controlled insurer by a controlling producer is equal to or greater than five
per cent of the admitted assets of the controlled insurer, as reported in the
controlled insurer's quarterly statement filed as of September 30 of the prior
year. However, the provisions of this section shall not apply if:

(1) The controlling producer:

(A) Places insurance only with the controlled
insurer, or only with the controlled insurer and a member or members of the
controlled insurer's holding company system, or the controlled insurer's
parent, affiliate, or subsidiary, and receives no compensation based upon the
amount of premiums written in connection with such insurance; and

(B) Accepts insurance placements only from
nonaffiliated subproducers, and not directly from insureds;

(2) The controlled insurer, except for insurance
business written through a residual market facility, accepts insurance business
only from a controlling producer, a producer controlled by the controlled
insurer, or a producer that is a subsidiary of the controlled insurer; and

(3) The controlling producer is domiciled in the
State and is authorized to do business only in the State and the controlled
insurer is licensed and conducting business only in the State.

(b) A controlled insurer shall not accept
business from a controlling producer and a controlling producer shall not place
business with a controlled insurer unless there is a written contract between
the controlling producer and the controlled insurer specifying the
responsibilities of each party, which contract has been approved by the board
of directors of the controlled insurer and contains the following minimum
provisions:

(1) The controlled insurer may terminate the contract
for cause, upon written notice to the controlling producer. The controlled
insurer shall suspend the authority of the controlling producer to write
business during the pendency of any dispute regarding the cause for the
termination;

(2) The controlling producer shall render accounts to
the controlled insurer detailing all material transactions, including information
necessary to support all commissions, charges, and other fees received by, or
owing to, the controlling producer;

(3) The controlling producer shall remit all funds
due under the terms of the contract to the controlled insurer on at least a
monthly basis. The due date shall be fixed so that premiums or installments of
premiums collected by the controlling producer shall be remitted no later than
ninety days after the effective date of the policy or policies placed with the
controlled insurer under the contract;

(4) All funds collected for the controlled insurer's
account shall be held by the controlling producer in a fiduciary capacity, in
one or more appropriately identified bank accounts in banks that are members of
the federal savings and loan insurance corporation or similar federal agency
pursuant to section 431:6-315;

(5) The controlling producer shall maintain
separately identifiable records of business written for the controlled insurer;

(6) The contract shall not be assigned in whole or in
part by the controlling producer;

(7) The controlled insurer shall provide the
controlling producer with its underwriting standards, rules and procedures,
manuals setting forth the rates to be charged, and the conditions for the
acceptance or rejection of risks. The controlling producer shall adhere to the
standards, rules, procedures, rates, and conditions. The standards, rules,
procedures, rates, and conditions shall be the same as those applicable to
comparable business placed with the controlled insurer by a producer other than
the controlling producer;

(8) The rates and terms of the controlling producer's
commissions, charges, or other fees and the purposes for those charges or
fees. The rates of the commissions, charges, and other fees shall be no greater
than those applicable to comparable business placed with the controlled insurer
by producers other than controlling producers. For purposes of this paragraph
and paragraph (7), examples of "comparable business" include the same
lines of insurance, same kinds of insurance, same kinds of risks, similar
policy limits, and similar quality of business;

(9) If the contract provides that the controlling
producer, on insurance business placed with the controlled insurer, is to be
compensated contingent upon the controlled insurer's profits on that business,
then that compensation shall not be determined and paid until at least five
years after the premiums are earned on liability insurance and at least one
year after the premiums are earned on any other insurance. In no event shall
the commissions be paid until the adequacy of the controlled insurer's reserves
on remaining claims has been independently verified pursuant to subsection (c);

(10) A limit on the controlling producer's production
in relation to the controlled insurer's surplus and total production. The
insurer may establish a different limit for each line or subline of business.
The controlled insurer shall notify the controlling producer when the
applicable limit is approached and shall not accept business from the
controlling producer if the limit is reached. The controlling producer shall
not place business with the controlled insurer if the producer has been
notified by the controlled insurer that the limit has been reached; and

(11) The controlling producer may negotiate, but shall
not bind, reinsurance on behalf of the controlled insurer on business the
controlling producer places with the controlled insurer, except that the
controlling producer may bind facultative reinsurance contracts pursuant to
obligatory facultative agreements if the contract with the controlled insurer
contains underwriting guidelines including, for both reinsurance assumed and
ceded, a list of reinsurers with which those automatic agreements are in
effect, the coverages and amounts or percentages that may be reinsured, and
commission schedules.

(c) Every controlled insurer shall have an
audit committee of the board of directors composed of independent directors.
The audit committee shall annually meet with management, the insurer's
independent certified public accountants, and an independent casualty actuary
or other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the commissioner to
review the adequacy of the controlled insurer's loss reserves.

(d) In addition to any other required loss
reserve certification, the controlled insurer annually, on April 1 of each
year, shall file with the commissioner an opinion of an independent casualty
actuary (or such other independent loss reserve specialist acceptable to the
commissioner) reporting loss ratios for each line of business written and
attesting to the adequacy of loss reserves established for losses incurred and
outstanding as of year-end (including incurred but not reported) on business
placed by the controlling producer. The controlled insurer shall annually
report to the commissioner the amount of commissions paid to the controlling
producer, the percentage that amount represents of the net premiums written,
and comparable amounts and percentages paid to noncontrolling producers for
placements of the same kinds of insurance with the controlled insurer. [L 1992,
c 176, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next